Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5448XS (2) 91 as/js S.F. 2108 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 804.5A Facial coverings. 1 1. For purposes of this section: 2 a. (1) âFacial coveringâ means any opaque mask, garment, 3 helmet, headgear, or other item that conceals or obscures the 4 facial identity of an individual including but not limited to a 5 balaclava, tactical mask, gator, ski mask, and any similar type 6 of facial covering or face-shielding item. 7 (2) âFacial coveringâ does not include any of the following: 8 (a) A translucent face shield or clear mask that does not 9 conceal the wearerâs facial identity and is used in compliance 10 with the employing agencyâs policies and procedures. 11 (b) A medical or surgical mask to protect against 12 transmission of disease or infection or any other mask, 13 helmet, or device, including but not limited to air-purifying 14 respirators, full or half masks, or self-contained breathing 15 apparatus necessary to protect against exposure to any toxin, 16 gas, smoke, inclement weather, or any other hazardous or 17 harmful environmental condition. 18 (c) A mask, helmet, or device, including but not limited to 19 a self-contained breathing apparatus, necessary for underwater 20 use. 21 (d) A motorcycle helmet when worn by an officer utilizing 22 a motorcycle or other vehicle that requires a helmet for safe 23 operations while in the performance of the officerâs duties. 24 (e) Eyewear necessary to protect from the use of retinal 25 weapons, including but not limited to lasers. 26 b. âPeace officerâ means a state patrol officer or a 27 regularly employed member of a police force of a city or county 28 as well as any officer or agent of a federal law enforcement 29 agency or any law enforcement agency from another state or any 30 person acting on behalf of a federal law enforcement agency or 31 law enforcement agency of another state. 32 2. A peace officer shall not wear a facial covering in the 33 performance of the officerâs duties. 34 3. A peace officer who willfully and knowingly violates this 35 -1- LSB 5448XS (2) 91 as/js 1/ 3 S.F. 2108 section is guilty of a serious misdemeanor. 1 4. Notwithstanding any other law, any peace officer 2 who is found to have committed an assault, battery, false 3 imprisonment, false arrest, abuse of process, or malicious 4 prosecution, while wearing a facial covering in a knowing and 5 willful violation of this section, shall not be entitled to 6 assert any privilege or immunity for the officerâs tortious 7 conduct against a claim of civil liability, and shall be liable 8 to the individual bringing such claim for actual damages or 9 statutory damages of not less than ten thousand dollars, 10 whichever is greater. 11